California statutes. Commercial Code
(e) The buyer or escrow agent shall, within 45 days after the buyer takes legal title to any of the goods, either pay to the extent of the cash consideration the claims filed and not disputed, or the applicable portion thereof to the extent of the cash consideration under subdivision (b) of Section 6106.4, or institute an action in interpleader pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 386 of the Code of Civil Procedure and deposit the consideration with the clerk of the court pursuant to subdivision (c) of that section. The action shall be brought in the appropriate court in the county where the seller had its principal place of business in this state. Sections 386.1 and 386.6 of the Code of Civil Procedure
 shall apply in the action.

(f) The notice shall state, in addition to the matters required by Section 6105, the name and address of the person with whom claims may be filed and the last date for filing claims, which shall be the business day before the date stated in the notice pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 6105. Claims shall be deemed timely filed only if actually received by the person designated in the notice to receive claims before the close of business on the day specified in the notice as the last date for filing claims.

(g) This section shall not be construed to release any security interest or other lien on the property which is the subject of the bulk sale except upon a voluntary release by the secured party or lienholder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1191, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

6106.4.

In any case where the notice of a bulk sale subject to Section 6106.2 states that claims may be filed with an escrow agent, the intended buyer shall deposit with the escrow agent the full amount of the purchase price or consideration. If, at the time the bulk sale is otherwise ready to be consummated, the amount of cash deposited or agreed to be deposited at or prior to consummation in the escrow is insufficient to pay in full all of the claims filed with the escrow agent, the escrow agent shall do each of the following:

(a) (1) Delay the distribution of the consideration and the passing of legal title for a period of not less than 25 days nor more than 30 days from the date the notice required in paragraph (2) is mailed. 

(2) Within five business days after the time the bulk sale would otherwise have been consummated, send a written notice to each claimant who has filed a claim stating the total consideration
 deposited or agreed to be deposited in the escrow, the name of each claimant who filed a claim against the escrow and the amount of each claim, the amount proposed to be paid to each claimant, the new date scheduled for the passing of legal title pursuant to paragraph (1) and the date on or before which distribution will be made to claimants which shall not be more than five days after the new date specified for the passing of legal title. 

(3) If no written objection to the distribution described in the notice required by paragraph (2) is received by the escrow agent prior to the new date specified in the notice for the passing of legal title, the escrow agent shall not be liable to any person to whom the notice required by paragraph (2) was sent for any good faith error that may have been committed in allocating and distributing the consideration as stated in the notice. 

(b) Distribute the consideration in the following order of priorities: 

(1) All obligations owing to the United States, to the extent given priority by federal law. 

(2) Secured claims, including statutory and judicial liens, to the extent of the consideration fairly attributable to the value of the properties securing the claims and in accordance with the priorities provided by law. A secured creditor shall participate in the distribution pursuant to this subdivision only if a release of lien is deposited by the secured creditor conditioned only upon receiving an amount equal to the distribution. 

(3) Escrow and professional charges and brokers’ fees attributable directly to the sale. 

(4) Wage claims given priority by Section 1205 of the Code of Civil Procedure. 

(5) All other tax claims. 

(6) All other unsecured claims pro rata, including any deficiency claims of partially secured creditors. 

(c) To the extent that an obligation of the buyer to pay cash in the future is a part of the consideration and the cash consideration is not sufficient to pay all claims filed in full, apply all principal and interest received on the obligation to the payment of claims in accordance with subdivision (b) until they are paid in full before making any payment to the seller. In that case, the notice sent pursuant to subdivision (a) shall state the amount, terms, and due dates of the obligation and the portion of the claims expected to be paid thereby. 

No funds may be drawn from the escrow, prior to the actual closing and completion of the escrow, for the payment, in whole or in part, of any commission, fee, or other consideration as compensation for a service that is contingent upon the performance of any act, condition, or instruction set forth in the escrow.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 1.5.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

6107.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), and subject to the limitation in subdivision (d), a buyer who fails to comply with the requirements of Section 6104 with respect to a claimant is liable to the claimant for damages in the amount of the claim, reduced by any amount that the claimant would not have realized if the buyer had complied.

(b) In an action under subdivision (a), the claimant has the burden of establishing the validity and amount of the claim, and the buyer has the burden of establishing the amount that the claimant would not have realized if the buyer had complied.

(c) A buyer who made a good faith and commercially reasonable effort to comply with the requirements of Section 6104 or to exclude the sale from the application of this division under subdivision (c) of Section 6103 is not liable to creditors for failure to comply with the requirements of Section 6104. The buyer has the burden of
 establishing the good faith and commercial reasonableness of the effort.

(d) In a single bulk sale the cumulative liability of the buyer for failure to comply with the requirements of Section 6104 may not exceed an amount equal to any of the following:

(1) If the assets consist only of inventory and equipment, twice the net contract price, less the amount of any part of the net contract price paid to or applied for the benefit of the seller or a creditor except to the extent that the payment or application is applied to a debt which is secured by the assets and which has been taken into consideration in determining the net contract price.

(2) If the assets include property other than inventory and equipment, twice the net value of the inventory and equipment less the amount of the portion of any part of the net contract price paid to or applied for the benefit of the seller or a creditor which is allocable to the inventory
 and equipment except to the extent that the payment or application is applied to a debt which is secured by the assets and which has been taken into consideration in determining the net contract price.

(e) For the purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), the “net value” of an asset is the value of the asset less each of the following:

(1) The amount of any proceeds of the sale of an asset, to the extent the proceeds are applied in partial or total satisfaction of a debt secured by the asset.

(2) The amount of any debt to the extent it is secured by a security interest or lien that is enforceable against the asset before and after it has been sold to a buyer. If a debt is secured by an asset and other property of the seller, the amount of the debt secured by a security interest or lien that is enforceable against the asset is determined by multiplying the debt by a fraction, the numerator of which is the value of the
 asset on the date of the bulk sale and the denominator of which is the value of all property securing the debt on the date of the bulk sale. The portion of a part of the net contract price paid to or applied for the benefit of the seller or a creditor that is “allocable to the inventory and equipment” is the portion that bears the same ratio to that part of the net contract price as the net value of the inventory and equipment bears to the net value of all of the assets.

(f) A payment made by the buyer to a person to whom the buyer is, or believes it is, liable under subdivision (a) reduces pro tanto the buyer’s cumulative liability under subdivision (d).

(g) No action may be brought under subdivision (a) by or on behalf of a claimant whose claim is unliquidated or contingent.

(h) A buyer’s failure to comply with the requirements of Section 6104 does not do any of the following:

(1) Impair the
 buyer’s rights in or title to the assets.

(2) Render the sale ineffective, void, or voidable.

(3) Entitle a creditor to more than a single satisfaction of its claim.

(4) Create liability other than as provided in this division.

(i) Payment of the buyer’s liability under subdivision (a) discharges pro tanto the seller’s debt to the creditor.

(j) Unless otherwise agreed, a buyer has an immediate right of reimbursement from the seller for any amount paid to a creditor in partial or total satisfaction of the buyer’s liability under subdivision (a).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1191, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

6108.

(a) Sections 6104, 6105, and 6107 apply to a bulk sale by auction and a bulk sale conducted by a liquidator on the seller’s behalf with the following modifications:

(1) “Buyer” refers to auctioneer or liquidator, as the case may be.

(2) “Net contract price” refers to net proceeds of the auction or net proceeds of the sale, as the case may be.

(3) The written notice required under subdivision (a) of Section 6105 shall be accompanied by a statement that the sale is to be by auction or by liquidation, the name of the auctioneer or liquidator, and the time and place of the auction or the time and place on or after which the liquidator will begin to sell assets on the seller’s behalf.

(4) In a single bulk sale the cumulative liability of the auctioneer or liquidator for failure to comply with the requirements of this section may not exceed the amount of the net
 proceeds of the sale allocable to inventory and equipment sold less the amount of the portion of any part of the net proceeds paid to or applied for the benefit of a creditor which is allocable to the inventory and equipment.

(b) A payment made by the auctioneer or liquidator to a person to whom the auctioneer or liquidator is, or believes it is, liable under this section reduces pro tanto the auctioneer’s or liquidator’s cumulative liability under paragraph (4) of subdivision (a).

(c) A person who buys at a bulk sale by auction or conducted by a liquidator need not comply with the requirements of Section 6104 and is not liable for the failure of an auctioneer or liquidator to comply with the requirements of this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1191, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

6110.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), an action under this division against a buyer, auctioneer, or liquidator shall be commenced within one year after the date of the bulk sale.

(b) If the buyer, auctioneer, or liquidator conceals the fact that the sale has occurred, the limitation is tolled and an action under this division may be commenced within the earlier of the following:

(1) One year after the person bringing the action discovers that the sale has occurred.

(2) One year after the person bringing the action should have discovered that the sale has occurred, but no later than two years after the date of the bulk sale. Complete noncompliance with the requirements of this division does not of itself constitute concealment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1191, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

6111.

(a) Except to the extent provided in subdivision (b), this division shall apply to a bulk sale if the date of the bulk sale is on or after January 1, 1991.

(b) If the date of a bulk sale is on or after January 1, 1991, and the date of the bulk-sale agreement is before January 1, 1991, all of the following shall apply:

(1) Paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 6103 and subdivision (b) of Section 6103 shall not apply and this division shall apply only if the goods are located in this state.

(2) Subdivision (a) of Section 6104 shall not apply.

(3) The buyer is required under subdivision (b) of Section 6104 to give notice in accordance with Section 6107, as in effect on December 31, 1990, rather than Section 6105.

(4) The buyer is required under subdivision (c) of Section 6104 to comply with Section 6106, as in effect on
 December 31, 1990, if the bulk sale is within the scope of that section, rather than Section 6106.2.

(5) Section 6105 shall not apply, and Section 6107, as in effect on December 31, 1990, shall apply.

(6) Sections 6106.2 and 6106.4 shall not apply, and Sections 6106 and 6106.1, as in effect on December 31, 1990, shall apply.

(7) No action may be brought under this division, as in effect either before or on or after January 1, 1991, if the provisions of this division, as in effect on December 31, 1990, have been complied with.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1191, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 7. DOCUMENTS OF TITLE [7101. - 7603.]



CHAPTER 1. General [7101. - 7106.]

7101.

This division may be cited as the Uniform Commercial Code—Documents of Title.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7102.

(a) In this division, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) “Bailee” means a person that by a warehouse receipt, bill of lading, or other document of title acknowledges possession of goods and contracts to deliver them.

(2) “Carrier” means a person that issues a bill of lading.

(3) “Consignee” means a person named in a bill of lading to which or to whose order the bill promises delivery.

(4) “Consignor” means a person named in a bill of lading as the person from which
 the goods have been received for shipment.

(5) “Delivery order” means a record that contains an order to deliver goods directed to a warehouse, carrier, or other person that in the ordinary course of business issues warehouse receipts or bills of lading.

(6) “Good faith” means honesty in fact and the observance of reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing.

(7) “Goods” means all things that are treated as movable for the purposes of a contract for storage or transportation.

(8) “Issuer” means a bailee that issues a document of title or, in the case of an unaccepted delivery order, the person that orders the possessor of goods to deliver. The term includes a
 person for which an agent or employee purports to act in issuing a document if the agent or employee has real or apparent authority to issue documents, even if the issuer did not receive any goods, the goods were misdescribed, or in any other respect the agent or employee violated the issuer’s instructions.

(9) “Person entitled under the document” means the holder, in the case of a negotiable document of title, or the person to which delivery of the goods is to be made by the terms of, or pursuant to instructions in a record under, a nonnegotiable document of title.

(10) [Reserved]

(11) [Reserved]

(12) “Shipper” means a person that enters
 into a contract of transportation with a carrier.

(13) “Warehouse” means a person engaged in the business of storing goods for hire.

(b) Definitions in other divisions applying to this division and the sections in which they appear are:

(1) “Contract for sale,” Section 2106.

(2) “Lessee in the ordinary course of business,” Section 10103.

(3) “Receipt of goods,” Section 2103.

(c) In addition, Division 1 (commencing with Section 1101) contains general definitions and principles of construction and interpretation applicable throughout this
 division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 17.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

7103.

(a) This division is subject to any treaty or statute of the United States or regulatory statute of this state to the extent the treaty, statute, or regulatory statute is applicable.

(b) This division does not modify or repeal any law prescribing the form or content of a document of title or the services or facilities to be afforded by a bailee, or otherwise regulating a bailee’s business in respects not specifically treated in this division. However, violation of such a law does not affect the status of a document of title that otherwise is within the definition of a document of title.

(c) This division modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001, et seq.) but does not modify, limit, or
 supersede Section 101(c) of that act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(c)) or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b)).

(d) To the extent there is a conflict between the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act (Title 2.5 (commencing with Section 1633.1) of Part 2 of Division 3 of the Civil Code) and this division, this division governs.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7104.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), a document of title is negotiable if by its terms the goods are to be delivered to bearer or to the order of a named person.

(b) A document of title other than one described in subdivision (a) is nonnegotiable. A bill of lading that states that the goods are consigned to a named person is not made negotiable by a provision that the goods are to be delivered only against an order in a record signed by the same or another named person.

(c) A document of title is nonnegotiable if, at the time it is issued, the document has a conspicuous legend, however expressed, that it is nonnegotiable.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7105.

(a) Upon request of a person entitled under an electronic document of title, the issuer of the electronic document may issue a tangible document of title as a substitute for the electronic document if:

(1) the person entitled under the electronic document surrenders control of the document to the issuer; and

(2) the tangible document when issued contains a statement that it is issued in substitution for the electronic document.

(b) Upon issuance of a tangible document of title in substitution for an electronic document of title in accordance with subdivision (a):

(1) the electronic document ceases to have any effect or validity; and

(2) the person that procured issuance of the tangible
 document warrants to all subsequent persons entitled under the tangible document that the warrantor was a person entitled under the electronic document when the warrantor surrendered control of the electronic document to the issuer.

(c) Upon request of a person entitled under a tangible document of title, the issuer of the tangible document may issue an electronic document of title as a substitute for the tangible document if:

(1) the person entitled under the tangible document surrenders possession of the document to the issuer; and

(2) the electronic document when issued contains a statement that it is issued in substitution for the tangible document.

(d) Upon issuance of an electronic document of title in substitution for a tangible document of title in accordance with subdivision (c):

(1) the tangible document ceases to have any effect or validity; and

(2) the person that procured issuance of the electronic document warrants to all subsequent persons entitled under the electronic document that the warrantor was a person entitled under the tangible document when the warrantor surrendered possession of the tangible document to the issuer.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7106.

(a) A person has control of an electronic document of title if a system employed for evidencing the transfer of interests in the electronic document reliably establishes that person as the person to which the electronic document was issued or transferred.

(b) A system satisfies subdivision (a), and a person has control of an electronic document of title, if the document is created, stored, and transferred in a manner that:

(1) a single authoritative copy of the document exists which is unique, identifiable, and, except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (4), (5), and (6),
 unalterable;

(2) the authoritative copy identifies the person asserting control as:

(A) the person to which the document was issued; or

(B) if the authoritative copy indicates that the document has been transferred, the person to which the document was most recently transferred;

(3) the authoritative copy is communicated to and maintained by the person asserting control or its designated custodian;

(4) copies or amendments that add or change an identified
 transferee of the authoritative copy can be made only with the consent of the person asserting control;

(5) each copy of the authoritative copy and any copy of a copy is readily identifiable as a copy that is not the authoritative copy; and

(6) any amendment of the authoritative copy is readily identifiable as authorized or unauthorized.

(c) A system satisfies subdivision (a), and a person has control of an electronic document of title, if an authoritative electronic copy of the document, a record attached to or logically associated with the electronic copy, or a system in which the electronic copy is recorded:

(1) enables the person readily to
 identify each electronic copy as either an authoritative copy or a nonauthoritative copy;

(2) enables the person readily to identify itself in any way, including by name, identifying number, cryptographic key, office, or account number, as the person to which each authoritative electronic copy was issued or transferred; and

(3) gives the person exclusive power, subject to subdivision (d), to:

(A) prevent others from adding or changing the person to which each authoritative electronic copy has been issued or transferred; and

(B) transfer control of each authoritative electronic copy.

(d) Subject
 to subdivision (e), a power is exclusive under subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) even if:

(1) the authoritative electronic copy, a record attached to or logically associated with the authoritative electronic copy, or a system in which the authoritative electronic copy is recorded limits the use of the document of title or has a protocol that is programmed to cause a change, including a transfer or loss of control; or

(2) the power is shared with another person.

(e) A power of a person is not shared with another person under paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) and the person’s power is not exclusive if:

(1) the person
 can exercise the power only if the power also is exercised by the other person; and

(2) the other person:

(A) can exercise the power without exercise of the power by the person; or

(B) is the transferor to the person of an interest in the document of title.

(f) If a person has the powers specified in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), the powers are presumed to be exclusive.

(g) A person has control of an electronic document of title if another person, other than the transferor to the person of an interest in the document:

(1) has control of the document and acknowledges that it has control on behalf of the person; or

(2) obtains control of the document after having acknowledged that it will obtain control of the document on behalf of the person.

(h) A person that has control under this section is not required
 to acknowledge that it has control on behalf of another person.

(i) If a person acknowledges that it has or will obtain control on behalf of another person, unless the person otherwise agrees or law other than this division or Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) otherwise provides, the person does not owe any duty to the other person and is not required to confirm the acknowledgment to any other person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 18.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Warehouse Receipts: Special Provisions [7201. - 7210.]

7201.

(a) A warehouse receipt may be issued by any warehouse.

(b) If goods, including distilled spirits and agricultural commodities, are stored under a statute requiring a bond against withdrawal or a license for the issuance of receipts in the nature of warehouse receipts, a receipt issued for the goods is deemed to be a warehouse receipt even if issued by a person that is the owner of the goods and is not a warehouse.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7202.

(a) A warehouse receipt need not be in any particular form.

(b) Unless a warehouse receipt provides for each of the following, the warehouse is liable for damages caused to a person injured by its omission:

(1) a statement of the location of the warehouse facility where the goods are stored;

(2) the date of issue of the receipt;

(3) the unique identification code of the receipt;

(4) a statement whether the goods received will be delivered to the bearer, to a named person, or to a named person or its order;

(5) the rate of storage and handling charges, unless goods are stored under a field warehousing arrangement, in which case a statement of that fact is
 sufficient on a nonnegotiable receipt;

(6) a description of the goods or the packages containing them;

(7) the signature of the warehouse or its agent;

(8) if the receipt is issued for goods that the warehouse owns, either solely, jointly, or in common with others, a statement of the fact of that ownership; and

(9) a statement of the amount of advances made and of liabilities incurred for which the warehouse claims a lien or security interest, unless the precise amount of advances made or liabilities incurred, at the time of the issue of the receipt, is unknown to the warehouse or to its agent that issued the receipt, in which case a statement of the fact that advances have been made or liabilities incurred and the purpose of the advances or liabilities is sufficient.

(c) A warehouse may insert in its receipt any terms that are not contrary to the provisions of this code
 and do not impair its obligation of delivery under Section 7403 or its duty of care under Section 7204. Any contrary provision is ineffective.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7203.

A party to or purchaser for value in good faith of a document of title, other than a bill of lading, that relies upon the description of the goods in the document may recover from the issuer damages caused by the nonreceipt or misdescription of the goods, except to the extent that:

(1) the document conspicuously indicates that the issuer does not know whether all or part of the goods in fact were received or conform to the description, such as a case in which the description is in terms of marks or labels or kind, quantity, or condition, or the receipt or description is qualified by “contents, condition, and quality unknown,” “said to contain,” or words of similar import, if the indication is true; or

(2) the party or purchaser otherwise has notice of the nonreceipt or
 misdescription.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7204.

(a) A warehouse is liable for damages for loss of or injury to the goods caused by its failure to exercise care with regard to the goods that a reasonably careful person would exercise under similar circumstances. Unless otherwise agreed, the warehouse is not liable for damages that could not have been avoided by the exercise of that care.

(b) Damages may be limited by a term in the warehouse receipt or storage agreement limiting the amount of liability in case of loss or damage beyond which the warehouse is not liable. Such a limitation is not effective with respect to the warehouse’s liability for conversion to its own use. On request of the bailor in a record at the time of signing the storage agreement or within a reasonable time after receipt of the warehouse receipt, the warehouse’s liability
 may be increased on part or all of the goods covered by the storage agreement or the warehouse receipt. In this event, increased rates may be charged based on an increased valuation of the goods.

(c) Reasonable provisions as to the time and manner of presenting claims and commencing actions based on the bailment may be included in the warehouse receipt or storage agreement.

(d) This section does not modify or repeal Section 1630 of the Civil Code nor any of the provisions of the Public Utilities Code or the Food and Agricultural Code or any lawful regulations issued thereunder.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7205.

A buyer in ordinary course of business of fungible goods sold and delivered by a warehouse that is also in the business of buying and selling such goods takes the goods free of any claim under a warehouse receipt even if the receipt is negotiable and has been duly negotiated.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7206.

(a) A warehouse, by giving notice to the person on whose account the goods are held and any other person known to claim an interest in the goods, may require payment of any charges and removal of the goods from the warehouse at the termination of the period of storage fixed by the document of title or, if a period is not fixed, within a stated period not less than 30 days after the warehouse gives notice. If the goods are not removed before the date specified in the notice, the warehouse may sell them pursuant to Section 7210.

(b) If a warehouse in good faith believes that goods are about to deteriorate or decline in value to less than the amount of its lien within the time provided in subdivision (a) and Section 7210, the warehouse may specify in the notice given under subdivision (a) any
 reasonable shorter time for removal of the goods and, if the goods are not removed, may sell them at public sale held not less than one week after a single advertisement or posting.

(c) If, as a result of a quality or condition of the goods of which the warehouse did not have notice at the time of deposit, the goods are a hazard to other property, the warehouse facilities, or other persons, the warehouse may sell the goods at public or private sale without advertisement or posting on reasonable notification to all persons known to claim an interest in the goods. If the warehouse, after a reasonable effort, is unable to sell the goods, it may dispose of them in any lawful manner and does not incur liability by reason of that disposition.

(d) A warehouse shall deliver the goods to any person entitled to them under this division upon due demand made at any time before sale or other disposition under this section.

(e) A warehouse
 may satisfy its lien from the proceeds of any sale or disposition under this section but shall hold the balance for delivery on the demand of any person to which the warehouse would have been bound to deliver the goods.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7207.

(a) Unless the warehouse receipt provides otherwise, a warehouse shall keep separate the goods covered by each receipt so as to permit at all times identification and delivery of those goods. However, different lots of fungible goods may be commingled.

(b) If different lots of fungible goods are commingled, the goods are owned in common by the persons entitled thereto and the warehouse is severally liable to each owner for that owner’s share. If, because of overissue, a mass of fungible goods is insufficient to meet all the receipts the warehouse has issued against it, the persons entitled include all holders to which overissued receipts have been duly negotiated.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7208.

If a blank in a negotiable tangible warehouse receipt has been filled in without authority, a good-faith purchaser for value and without notice of the lack of authority may treat the insertion as authorized. Any other unauthorized alteration leaves any tangible or electronic warehouse receipt enforceable against the issuer according to its original tenor.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7209.

(a) A warehouse has a lien against the bailor on the goods covered by a warehouse receipt or storage agreement or on the proceeds thereof in its possession for charges for storage or transportation, including demurrage and terminal charges, insurance, labor, or other charges, present or future, in relation to the goods, and for expenses necessary for preservation of the goods or reasonably incurred in their sale pursuant to law. If the person on whose account the goods are held is liable for similar charges or expenses in relation to other goods whenever deposited and it is stated in the warehouse receipt or storage agreement that a lien is claimed for charges and expenses in relation to other goods, the warehouse also has a lien against the goods covered by the warehouse receipt or storage agreement or on the proceeds thereof
 in its possession for those charges and expenses, whether or not the other goods have been delivered by the warehouse. However, as against a person to which a negotiable warehouse receipt is duly negotiated, a warehouse’s lien is limited to charges in an amount or at a rate specified in the warehouse receipt or, if no charges are so specified, to a reasonable charge for storage of the specific goods covered by the receipt subsequent to the date of the receipt.

(b) A warehouse may also reserve a security interest against the bailor for the maximum amount specified on the receipt for charges other than those specified in subdivision (a), such as for money advanced and interest. The security interest is governed by Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101).

(c) A warehouse’s lien for charges and expenses under subdivision (a) or a security interest under subdivision (b) is also effective against any person that so entrusted the bailor with possession of
 the goods that a pledge of them by the bailor to a good-faith purchaser for value would have been valid. However, the lien or security interest is not effective against a person that before issuance of a document of title had a legal interest or a perfected security interest in the goods and that did not:

(1) deliver or entrust the goods or any document of title covering the goods to the bailor or the bailor’s nominee with:

(A) actual or apparent authority to ship, store, or sell;

(B) power to obtain delivery under Section 7403; or

(C) power of disposition under Section 2403 or 9320 or subdivision (c) of Section 9321 or subdivision (b) of Section 10304 or subdivision (b) of Section 10305 or other statute or rule of law; or

(2) acquiesce in the procurement by the bailor or its nominee of any document.

(d) A warehouse’s lien on household goods
 for charges and expenses in relation to the goods under subdivision (a) is also effective against all persons if the depositor was the legal possessor of the goods at the time of deposit. In this subdivision, “household goods” means furniture, furnishings, or personal effects used by the depositor in a dwelling.

(e) A warehouse loses its lien on any goods that it voluntarily delivers or unjustifiably refuses to deliver.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7210.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), a warehouse’s lien may be enforced by public or private sale of the goods, in bulk or in packages, at any time or place and on any terms that are commercially reasonable, after notifying all persons known to claim an interest in the goods. Notification may be made by mail, personal service, or verifiable electronic mail. The notification must include a statement of the amount due, the nature of the proposed sale, and the time and place of any public sale. The fact that a better price could have been obtained by a sale at a different time or in a method different from that selected by the warehouse is not of itself sufficient to establish that the sale was not made in a commercially reasonable manner. The warehouse sells in a commercially reasonable manner if the warehouse
 sells the goods in the usual manner in any recognized market therefor, sells at the price current in that market at the time of the sale, or otherwise sells in conformity with commercially reasonable practices among dealers in the type of goods sold. A sale of more goods than apparently necessary to be offered to ensure satisfaction of the obligation is not commercially reasonable, except in cases covered by the preceding sentence.

(b) A warehouse may enforce its lien on goods, other than goods stored by a merchant in the course of its business, only if the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) All persons known to claim an interest in the goods must be notified.

(2) The notification must include an itemized statement of the claim, a description of the goods subject to the lien, a demand for payment within a specified time not less than 10 days after receipt of the notification, and a conspicuous statement that unless the
 claim is paid within that time the goods will be advertised for sale and sold by auction at a specified time and place.

(3) The sale must conform to the terms of the notification.

(4) The sale must be held at the nearest suitable place to where the goods are held or stored.
